North Carolina, session 2025, SB454.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. DIRECT THE DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE TO ASSIST LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES IN APPLYING FOR GRANT FUNDS AND FUND
POSITIONS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART
SECTION 1.1. The Department of Justice shall provide assistance to law
enforcement agencies seeking grant funds, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Alerting law enforcement agencies to available grant funds.
(2) Assisting law enforcement agencies with drafting and submitting grant
proposals and applications.
SECTION 1.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be
used to hire grant writers to assist law enforcement agencies pursuant to the requirements of
Section 1.1 of this Part.
SECTION 1.3. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART II. SUPPORT COMMUNITY POLICING PROGRAMS
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be used to award grants to law enforcement agencies for initiatives supporting community
policing.
SECTION 2.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART III. CREATE INCENTIVES FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND
AGENCIES
SECTION 3.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in recurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to provide the following types of grants:
(1) Grants provided to law enforcement agencies to be awarded to law
enforcement officers exhibiting exemplary service, as established by the
Department of Justice.
(2) Grants awarded to law enforcement agencies for meeting racial or gender
diversity benchmarks, as established by the Department of Justice.
*S454-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.2. No grant awarded pursuant to this Part shall exceed ten thousand
dollars ($10,000).
SECTION 3.3. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART IV. REVISE POLICE USE OF FORCE POLICIES
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 15A-401(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Use of Force in Arrest. –
…
(2) A law-enforcement officer is justified in using deadly physical force upon
another person for a purpose specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection
only when it is or appears to be reasonably necessary thereby:
…
Strangleholds, lateral vascular neck restraints, carotid restraints, or any other
tactics that restrict oxygen or blood flow to the head or neck shall be
considered the use of deadly force under this subdivision.
Nothing in this subdivision constitutes justification for willful, malicious or
criminally negligent conduct by any person which injures or endangers any
person or property, nor shall it be construed to excuse or justify the use of
unreasonable or excessive force.
(3) Under all circumstances in which a law-enforcement officer uses force of any
kind, a law-enforcement officer shall use the minimum amount of force
reasonably necessary to accomplish the law-enforcement action and shall
attempt to utilize de-escalation tactics when possible."
SECTION 4.2. The Attorney General, in consultation with the North Carolina
Sheriffs' Association and the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police, shall develop
uniform use of force policies that may be adopted by all law enforcement agencies in the State.
These policies shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and
Public Safety no later than December 1, 2025, shall be published on the Department of Justice
website, and shall be distributed in digital format by the Attorney General to all law enforcement
agencies in the State.
SECTION 4.3. Section 4.1 of this Part becomes effective October 1, 2025, and
applies to actions taken on or after that date. The remainder of this Part is effective when it
becomes law.

PART V. ESTABLISH MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR THE HIRING AND TRAINING
OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
SECTION 5.1. G.S. 17C-6(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(2a) Establish the minimum age requirement that shall be met in order to qualify
for entry level employment as a criminal justice officer in temporary or
probationary status or in a permanent position, which shall not be less than 21
years of age.
…."
SECTION 5.2. G.S. 17C-13(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 15A-145.4 or G.S. 15A-145.5, the Commission may gain
access to a person's misdemeanor and felony conviction records, including those maintained by
the Administrative Office of the Courts in its confidential files containing the names of persons
granted expunctions. The Commission may deny, suspend, or revoke a person's certification
Page 2 Senate Bill 454-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
based solely on that person's felony conviction, conviction or the conviction of four or more
misdemeanors, whether or not that conviction was the convictions were expunged, unless the
conviction was convictions were expunged pursuant to G.S. 15A-145.4 or G.S. 15A-145.8A."
SECTION 5.3. G.S. 17E-4(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The Commission shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities, which
are enforceable through its rules and regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of
G.S. 17E-8 and G.S. 17E-9:
…
(2a) Establish the minimum age requirement that shall be met in order to qualify
for entry level employment as an officer in temporary or probationary status
or in a permanent position, which shall not be less than 21 years of age.
…
The Commission may certify, and no additional certification shall be required from it, programs,
courses and teachers certified by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission. Where the Commission determines that a program, course, instructor or
teacher is required for an area which is unique to the office of sheriff, the Commission may certify
such program, course, instructor, or teacher under such standards and procedures as it may
establish."
SECTION 5.4. G.S. 17E-12(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 15A-145.4 or G.S. 15A-145.5, the Commission may gain
access to a person's misdemeanor and felony conviction records, including those maintained by
the Administrative Office of the Courts in its confidential files containing the names of persons
granted expunctions. The Commission may deny, suspend, or revoke a person's certification
based solely on that person's felony conviction, conviction or the conviction of four or more
misdemeanors, whether or not that conviction was the convictions were expunged, unless the
conviction was convictions were expunged pursuant to G.S. 15A-145.4 or G.S. 15A-145.8A."
SECTION 5.5. Sections 5.1 and 5.3 of this Part become effective January 1, 2026,
and apply to officers hired or employed on or after that date. Sections 5.2 and 5.4 of this Part
become effective January 1, 2026, and apply to (i) officers hired on or after that date and (ii)
officers employed on or after that date that are convicted of a felony or misdemeanor on or after
that date. The remainder of this Part is effective when it becomes law.

PART VI. FUND ADDITIONAL DETECTIVES OR INVESTIGATIVE OFFICERS TO
INVESTIGATE THE SEVERE CRIMES
SECTION 6.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be used to provide grants to law enforcement agencies to temporarily provide partial or
total funding for detective or other investigative law enforcement positions in order to aid in the
investigation of person crimes that would constitute a charge of a Class D felony or higher.
SECTION 6.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART VII. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7.1. If any Part, section, or provision of this act is declared
unconstitutional or invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or
any portion other than the portion declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.
SECTION 7.2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 454-First Edition Page 3